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DI3ME-02

DTC 13 Fuel Tank Select Relay Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-138.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

e Fueltank selectrelay

* Open orshortinmain fuel pump circuit

* Main fuel pump

e Fuelpumprelay

« Circuitopeningrelay

 Shortin sub fuel tank forcing driving relay circuit

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch OFF
13 (Voltage of FPMS terminal is low)
(b) Voltage of FPM terminal is low

¢) Voltage of FPMR terminal is high
© g g  Sub fueltank forcing driving relay

« Shortin sub fuel pump circuit (+B short)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-138.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI-56).

@

2 [ Check voltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

NG> Replace fuel tank select relay.

/wON Fuel Tank Changeover | PREPARATION:
/ Switch is OFF (@) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

Seescanbail et Baeas £ | (c) Fuel tank changeover switch is OFF.
SR | CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU and
FPMR (+) body ground, andturntheignition switch ON after 4 seconds

or more.

RG%685 = nosees|  OK:

Voltage:0 - 3.0V

0K> Go to step 5.
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3 | Check sub fuel tank forcing driving relay (See page FI-58).

@

NG>

Q

Replace sub fuel tank forcing driving relay, an
then go to step 5.

4 | Check for short in harness and connector between sub fuel tank forcing driving
relay and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

@

NG>

Repair or replace harness and connector, and
then go to step 5.

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

(See page DI-138, step 1).

5 [ Check voltage between terminal FPM of engine ECU connector and body ground

NG

ox )

Go to step 8.

6 | Check fuel pump relay (Marking: FUEL/PMP) (See page Fl-54).
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e )

Replace fuel pump relay.
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7 | Check circuit opening relay (Marking: C/OPN) (See page FI-53).

NG> Replace circuit opening relay.

@

8 | Check operation of main fuel pump (See page DI-138, step 5).

HINT:
Ifyouhavenohand -heldtester,andthengotostep9.

OKés tostep 11.

NG

9 | Check main fuel pump (See page FI-7).

NG> Replace main fuel pump.

10 Check for open or shortin harness and connector between main fuel pump and
fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and fuel pump relay, fuel pump relay
and circuit opening relay (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace.
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11 Checkforopenand shortin harness and connector between fuel tank select
relay and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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